Connecticut, session 2026, SB00044.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to increase the
qualifying income thresholds for the full Social Security benefits
deduction from the personal income tax as follows: (1) For unmarried
individuals and married individuals filing separately, less than one
hundred thousand dollars; and (2) for heads of households and married
individuals filing jointly, less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars.